Utah statutes.
10-15-4.   Powers of legislative body of municipality.

The legislative body of the municipalities of this state shall have the power:

(1)  to establish pedestrian malls;

(2)  to prohibit, in whole or in part, vehicular traffic on a pedestrian mall;

(3)  to pay from the general funds of the municipality, or from other available money, or from the proceeds of assessments levied on land benefited by the establishment of a pedestrian mall, the damages, if any, allowed or awarded to any property owner by reason of the establishment of the pedestrian mall;

(4)  to acquire, construct, and maintain on the municipality's streets which are established as a pedestrian mall, improvements of any kind or nature necessary or convenient to the operation of such streets as a pedestrian mall, including paving, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, sewers, drainage works, lighting facilities, fire protection facilities, flood protection facilities, water distribution facilities, vehicular parking areas, retaining walls, landscaping, tree planting, statuaries, fountains, decorative structures, benches, rest rooms, child care facilities, display facilities, information booths, public assembly facilities, and other structures, works or improvements necessary or convenient to serve members of the public using such pedestrian malls, including the reconstruction or relocation of existing municipally owned works, improvements, or facilities on such municipal streets; which foregoing changes or any portions thereof, are referred to in this act as "improvements";

(5)  to pay from the general funds of the municipality or other available money, or from the proceeds of assessments levied on property benefited by any such improvements, or from the proceeds of special improvement warrants or bonds, the whole or any portion of the costs of acquisition, construction, and maintenance of such improvements in accordance with the provisions of Title 11, Chapter 42, Assessment Area Act, relating to special improvement assessments; and

(6)  to do any and all other acts or things necessary or convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter.

